lib/dict/lt.aff
SFX M Y 41
SFX M s       es              is
SFX M s       ai              [^dt]is
SFX M is      þiai            dis
SFX M tis     èiai            tis
SFX M is      á               is
SFX M s       mi              is
SFX M is      yje             is
SFX M is      y               is
SFX M s       e               is
SFX M is      ys              is
SFX M s       ms              is
SFX M s       mis             is
SFX M is      yse             is
SFX M ë       ers             ë
SFX M ë       eriai           ë
SFX M ë       erá             ë
SFX M ë       erimi           ë
SFX M ë       eryje           ë
SFX M ë       erie            ë
SFX M uo      ers             uo
SFX M uo      eriai           uo
SFX M uo      erá             uo
SFX M uo      erimi           uo
SFX M uo      eryje           uo
SFX M uo      erie            uo
SFX M ë       erys            ë
SFX M ë       erø             ë
SFX M ë       erims           ë
SFX M ë       eris            ë
SFX M ë       erimis          ë
SFX M ë       eryse           ë
SFX M uo      erys            uo
SFX M uo      erø             uo
SFX M uo      erims           uo
SFX M uo      eris            uo
SFX M uo      erimis          uo
SFX M uo      eryse           uo
SFX M ys      ims             ys
SFX M ys      is              ys
SFX M ys      imis            ys
SFX M 0       e               ys

SFX C Y 31
SFX C as      o               as
SFX C s       m               as
SFX C as      à               as
SFX C as      uo              as
SFX C s       me              as
SFX C as      ie              [^k]as
SFX C as      ø               [^k]as
SFX C as      iems            [^k]as
SFX C as      uos             [^k]as
SFX C s       is              [^k]as
SFX C as      uose            [^k]as
SFX C s       io              ks
SFX C s       iam             ks
SFX C s       á               ks
SFX C s       iu              ks
SFX C s       iame            ks
SFX C s       ie              ks
SFX C s       iø              ks
SFX C s       iems            ks
SFX C s       ius             ks
SFX C s       iais            ks
SFX C s       iuose           ks
SFX C a       os              a
SFX C 0       i               a
SFX C a       à               a
SFX C a       oje             a
SFX C a       ø               a
SFX C a       oms             a
SFX C 0       s               a
SFX C a       omis            a
SFX C a       ose             a

SFX B Y 151
SFX B as      o               as
SFX B s       m               as
SFX B as      à               as
SFX B as      u               as
SFX B s       me              as
SFX B as      i               [^i]as
SFX B as      ø               as
SFX B as      iems            [^i]as
SFX B as      iem             [^i]as
SFX B as      us              as
SFX B s       is              as
SFX B as      uose            as
SFX B s       0               as
SFX B as      os              as
SFX B s       i               as
SFX B as      oje             as
SFX B as      oj              as
SFX B as      oms             as
SFX B as      om              as
SFX B as      omis            as
SFX B as      ose             as
SFX B as      0               [^èþ]ias
SFX B èias    ti              èias
SFX B as      0               [^d]þias
SFX B as      ems             [^èþ]ias
SFX B as      em              [^èþ]ias
SFX B èias    tiems           èias
SFX B èias    tiem            èias
SFX B as      ems             [^d]þias
SFX B as      em              [^d]þias
SFX B s       o               [^djt]is
SFX B s       am              [^djt]is
SFX B is      á               is
SFX B s       u               [^djt]is
SFX B s       ame             [^djt]is
SFX B s       0               is
SFX B is      þio             dis
SFX B is      þiam            dis
SFX B is      þiu             dis
SFX B is      þiame           dis
SFX B is      o               jis
SFX B is      am              jis
SFX B is      u               jis
SFX B is      ame             jis
SFX B tis     èio             tis
SFX B tis     èiam            tis
SFX B tis     èiu             tis
SFX B tis     èiame           tis
SFX B s       ai              [^djt]is
SFX B s       ø               [^djt]is
SFX B s       us              [^djt]is
SFX B s       ais             [^djt]is
SFX B s       uose            [^djt]is
SFX B is      þiai            dis
SFX B is      þiø             dis
SFX B is      þius            dis
SFX B is      þiais           dis
SFX B is      þiuose          dis
SFX B is      ai              jis
SFX B is      ø               jis
SFX B is      us              jis
SFX B is      ais             jis
SFX B is      uose            jis
SFX B tis     èiai            tis
SFX B tis     èiø             tis
SFX B tis     èius            tis
SFX B tis     èiais           tis
SFX B tis     èiuose          tis
SFX B is      ë               is
SFX B is      ës              is
SFX B is      ei              is
SFX B is      æ               is
SFX B is      e               is
SFX B is      ëje             is
SFX B is      ëj              is
SFX B is      ëms             is
SFX B is      es              is
SFX B is      ëmis            is
SFX B is      ëse             is
SFX B us      aus             us
SFX B us      iam             [^djt]us
SFX B us      þiam            dus
SFX B us      am              jus
SFX B tus     èiam            tus
SFX B us      ø               us
SFX B us      iu              [^djt]us
SFX B us      þiu             dus
SFX B s       0               jus
SFX B tus     èiu             tus
SFX B us      iame            [^djt]us
SFX B us      þiame           dus
SFX B us      ame             jus
SFX B tus     èiame           tus
SFX B us      ûs              us
SFX B us      iø              [^djt]us
SFX B us      þiø             dus
SFX B tus     èiø             tus
SFX B us      iems            us
SFX B us      iem             us
SFX B us      ius             [^djt]us
SFX B us      þius            dus
SFX B tus     èius            tus
SFX B us      iais            [^djt]us
SFX B us      þiais           dus
SFX B us      ais             jus
SFX B tus     èiais           tus
SFX B us      iuose           [^dtj]us
SFX B us      þiuose          dus
SFX B s       ose             jus
SFX B tus     èiuose          tus
SFX B us      i               us
SFX B us      ios             [^djt]us
SFX B us      iai             [^djt]us
SFX B us      ià              [^djt]us
SFX B us      ia              [^djt]us
SFX B us      ioje            [^djt]us
SFX B us      ioj             [^djt]us
SFX B us      þios            dus
SFX B us      þiai            dus
SFX B us      þià             dus
SFX B us      þia             dus
SFX B us      þioje           dus
SFX B us      þioj            dus
SFX B us      os              jus
SFX B us      ai              jus
SFX B us      à               jus
SFX B us      a               jus
SFX B us      oje             jus
SFX B us      oj              jus
SFX B tus     èios            tus
SFX B tus     èiai            tus
SFX B tus     èià             tus
SFX B tus     èia             tus
SFX B tus     èioje           tus
SFX B tus     èioj            tus
SFX B us      ioms            [^djt]us
SFX B us      ias             [^djt]us
SFX B us      iomis           [^djt]us
SFX B us      iose            [^djt]us
SFX B us      þioms           dus
SFX B us      þias            dus
SFX B us      þiomis          dus
SFX B us      þiose           dus
SFX B us      oms             jus
SFX B us      as              jus
SFX B us      omis            jus
SFX B us      ose             jus
SFX B tus     èioms           tus
SFX B tus     èias            tus
SFX B tus     èiomis          tus
SFX B tus     èiose           tus
