lib/dict/lt.dic
abejokia/C
abejoks/C
adatinis/BNU
ağis/IM
aistringas/BNQ
aklatis/IM
aksomiğkas/BNQ
şalialapis/BNU
alpinistinis/BNU
ğalvis/IM
amoralus/BNQ
ana/C
anas/C
angis/IM
angliğkas/BNQ
ankğtis/DIM
anokia/C
anoks/C
antidemokratiğkas/BNQ
antis/DIM
antivandeninis/BNU
apağtalinis/BNU
apgautis/IM
apibrëştis/IM
apydidis/BNU
apyğlapis/BNU
apysaldis/BNU
apytrumpis/BNU
apsiaustis/IM
apstus/BNQ
apsuptis/IM
arktinis/BNU
Arktis/IM
asimetrinis/BNU
atidus/BNQ
atimtis/IM
atmintis/IM
atpakalias/BNQ
atskirtis/IM
ağtuonlinkas/BNQ
aukğtaskraidis/BNU
autostotis/IM
avangardinis/BNU
baigtis/IM
balansinis/BNU
baltkaktis/BU
bazaltinis/BNU
begalvis/BNU
belytis/BNU
bergşdşias/BNQ
betriukğmis/BNU
biologinis/BNU
bjaurastis/IM
blandis/IM
botaninis/BNU
brandis/IM
budis/IM
bukas/BNQ
bukstis/IM
chimerinis/BNU
dabarnykğtis/BNU
dabartis/IM
dalis/IM
dantinis/BNU
daugiadalis/BNU
daugiapartinis/BNU
daugkartinis/BNU
dekoratyvinis/BNU
detektyvinis/BNU
didelis/BNW
dieveris/IM
dilgëlinis/BNU
dingstis/IM
dispeèerinis/BNU
dobstis/IM
dorovingas/BNQ
driekus/BNQ
drumstis/IM
dëtis/IM
dujinis/BNU
duktë/DM
dvejopas/BNQ
dvilinkas/BNQ
dviskiltis/BNU
şebenkğtis/IM
şebrasnukis/BNU
ğeğianaris/BNU
Ğeimatis/IM
ekonominis/BNU
eleginis/BNU
şemyninis/BNU
epizodinis/BNU
èesnakinis/BNU
fantastiğkas/BNQ
fizinis/BNU
frazinis/BNU
gaiğatis/IM
gaiğtis/IM
ágaliotinis/BDU
garankğtis/IM
garus/BNQ
geltonpilvis/BNU
gentis/IM
geriatrinis/BNU
ágimtis/IM
gişus/BNQ
gyvastis/IM
gyvuonis/IM
gnaibus/BNQ
grandiğkas/BNQ
grandis/IM
griliaşinis/BNU
grindis/IM
griûtis/IM
grûstis/IM
gàslus/BNQ
hibridinis/BNU
humanistinis/BNU
şiauberis/IM
iğdaigingas/BNQ
iğeitis/IM
ielaktis/IM
ietis/IM
şieşulingas/BNQ
iğimtis/IM
ikivedybinis/BNU
ilgapluoğtis/BNU
ilgatis/IM
iğmintis/IM
ğimtatûkstantinis/BNU
intervokalinis/BNU
ğiokia/C
ğioks/C
şiotys/IM
ğirdis/IM
iğskirtis/IM
ğita/CD
ğitas/C
iğtiktis/IM
ğitokia/C
ğitoks/C
ğiugşdus/BNQ
iğvestis/IM
iğvyktis/IM
jaunatis/IM
jokia/C
joks/C
jûsiğkas/BNQ
kadaginis/BNU
kaşkas/C
kaşkatra/C
kaşkatras/C
kaşkokia/C
kaşkoks/C
kamğatis/IM
kandis/DIM
kanonierinis/BNU
karğatis/IM
kas/CN
kastinis/BNU
katra/C
katras/C
ákeltis/IM
keraminis/BNU
kiaurinis/BNU
kibirkğtis/IM
kirkğnis/IM
kirmis/IM
kita/CD
kitokia/C
kitoks/C
klaviğinis/BNU
klintis/IM
klotis/IMV
klëtis/IM
kokia/CN
koks/CN
komandinis/BNU
kontrabandinis/BU
kreditorinis/BNU
kreiptis/IM
krytis/DIM
krosnis/IM
krûsnis/IM
kuklus/BNQ
kulkğnis/IM
kulnis/IM
laiğkus/BNQ
Laktis/IM
leksikografinis/BNU
lemtis/IM
liaudis/IM
lûğis/IM
literatûriğkas/BNQ
liûtis/IM
lygtis/IM
lytis/IM
làstelinis/BNU
magztis/IM
maiğatis/IM
makğtis/IM
malonus/BNQ
mechaniğkas/BNQ
metrinis/BNU
mirtinis/BNU
mirtis/IM
moreninis/BNU
Mërnastis/IM
natûralistinis/BNU
nebûtis/IM
Neris/IM
nertis/IM
netektis/IM
nieşinis/BNU
nytis/IM
nytys/IM
nosis/IMV
nuosavas/BNQ
omenis/IM
opëtas/BNQ
Pağalèis/IM
paşastis/IM
pagiriotas/BNQ
paşintis/IM
paleistis/IM
paliûtis/IM
pamarinis/BNU
papjûtis/IM
parengtis/IM
parinktis/IM
partizaniğkas/BNQ
paskirtis/IM
paslaptis/IM
paspirtis/IM
pateiktis/IM
patirtis/IM
patronaşinis/BNU
penkiapëdis/BNU
pentis/IM
pietinis/BNU
pilis/IM
pilnatis/IM
Ápiltis/IM
pirğys/IM
pirtis/IM
pjaustytinis/BNU
plikasëklis/BNU
plënis/IM
podiplominis/BNU
portabilus/BNQ
praeitis/IM
pragaiğtis/IM
prakurtis/IM
pramuğtgalviğkas/BNQ
prapultis/IM
praşûtis/IM
priekrantinis/BNU
prigimtis/IM
priprastas/BNQ
prûsinis/BNU
pusgarsis/BNU
pusnis/IM
pustuğtis/BNU
rakğtis/IM
árankinis/BNU
refleksinis/BNU
retinis/BNU
rûgğtis/DIM
rimtis/IMN
rûğis/IM
rytietiğkas/BNQ
rungtis/IM
ruplëtas/BNQ
sagtis/IM
sartas/BNQ
sausatis/IM
schematinis/BNU
sëdşia/IM
senatis/IM
serijinis/BNU
sesuo/M
Siesartis/IM
simbiozinis/BNU
skanus/BNQ
skiltis/IM
skirtis/IM
skraubus/BNQ
slinktis/IM
smailiavirğûnis/BNU
ğûsnis/IM
sofistinis/BNU
sproglus/BNQ
spûstis/IM
ástatymiğkas/BNQ
storstiklis/BNU
stotis/IM
sugaiğtis/IM
sultys/IM
supiltinis/BNU
sutaptis/IM
suteptis/IM
ta/CN
tamprus/BNQ
tarpueilinis/BNU
tartis/IM
tas/CN
tenykğtis/BNU
tipingas/BNQ
toğis/IM
tokia/CDN
toks/CN
traiğkus/BNQ
tremtis/IM
triklasis/BNU
trûnys/IM
troğkulingas/BNQ
tvaskus/BNQ
uşduotis/IM
uşgrobtis/IM
uoguotas/BNQ
uolektis/IM
uştartis/IM
Uşğustis/IM
vagoninis/BNU
vakuuminis/BNU
varğkus/BNQ
ğvelniabalsis/BNU
verpatis/IM
viduramşis/BNU
vienarûğis/BNU
vienlypis/BNU
vienokia/C
vienoks/C
viesuluotas/BNQ
vilktis/IM
viltis/IMN
virtinis/BNU
visa/CN
visokia/C
visoks/C
vylus/BNQ
vytis/DIM
